Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-122.02
Compensation; cessation of income benefits; income benefits.

Upon the cessation of income benefits under section 48-122.01 to or on account of any person, the income benefits of the remaining persons entitled to income benefits for the unexpired part of the period during which their income benefits are payable shall be that which such persons would have received if they had been the only persons entitled to income benefits at the time of the decedent's death.

Laws 1973, LB 193, § 4.